District of Columbia statutes.
29A-101.105

Repealed

Foreign corporations — Effect of certificate of authority.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 22, ch. 269, § 105
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-101.105.
1981 Ed., § 29-399.6.
1973 Ed., § 29-933f.